Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.010

Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to facilitate public supervision over the administration of public charitable trusts and similar relationships and to clarify and implement the powers and duties of the attorney general and the secretary of state with relation thereto.

[ 1993 c 471 s 25; 1985 c 30 s 113. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 53 s 1. Formerly RCW 19.10.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 471: See RCW 19.09.915.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.